Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1816
Metropolitan transit authority; board; employees; private interest; prohibited.

No member of the board and no officer or employee of the authority shall have any private financial interest, profit, or benefit in any contract, work, or business of the authority and in the sale or lease of any property to or from the authority.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 16, p. 171.